Hawaii, session 2025, SB520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The department of health shall amend its administrative rules in accordance with chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to limit the number of dwelling units that may be connected to a single individual wastewater system to not more than five dwelling units; provided that a single dwelling shall not have more than a total of five dwelling units; provided further that a total of five tiny homes with not more than one dwelling unit each may all be connected to one individual wastewater system. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________